Maine, session 132, LD1589.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 24-A MRSA §2744, sub-§2, as repealed and replaced by PL 2005, c. 683,
Pt. A, §39, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 24-A MRSA §2744, sub-§2-A, as repealed and replaced by PL 2005, c.
683, Pt. A, §39, is amended to read:
2-A. Subsections 1 and 2 apply Subsection 1 applies with respect to the following
types of professionals:
A. A psychologist licensed to practice in this State;
B. A certified social worker licensed for the independent practice of social work in
this State;
C. A licensed clinical professional counselor licensed for the independent practice of
counseling in this State;
D. A licensed nurse who is certified by the American Nurses' Association as a clinical
specialist in adult psychiatric and mental health nursing or as a clinical specialist in
child and adolescent psychiatric and mental health nursing;
E. A marriage and family therapist licensed as a marriage and family therapist in this
State; and
F. A licensed pastoral counselor licensed as a pastoral counselor in this State.
Sec. 3. 24-A MRSA §2744, sub-§3, as repealed and replaced by PL 2005, c. 683,
Pt. A, §39, is repealed.
Sec. 4. 24-A MRSA §2744, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Coverage of outpatient counseling services; reimbursement and participation.
An insurer that issues individual health care contracts providing coverage for mental health
services shall provide coverage for outpatient counseling services in accordance with this
subsection.
A. An insurer shall reimburse for outpatient counseling services when those services
are provided by a licensed counseling professional providing services that are within
the lawful scope of practice of the counseling professional’s license, including a master
social worker, clinical social worker, clinical professional counselor, pastoral
counselor or marriage and family therapist.
B. At a minimum, an insurer shall reimburse for outpatient counseling services in an
amount equal to 150% of the MaineCare reimbursement rate for that service.
C. An insurer may not discriminate against a licensed counseling professional as
described in paragraph A or arbitrarily reduce the reimbursement rate for outpatient
counseling services provided by a licensed counseling professional based solely on the
type of license held by a licensed counseling professional.
D. An insurer may not impose prior authorization or referral requirements as a
condition of coverage for outpatient counseling services or impose any restriction or
limitation on access to outpatient counseling services that does not have a clinical basis.
Page 1 - 132LR1782(01)

E. An insurer shall maintain an adequate network of licensed counseling professionals
to ensure reasonable access to outpatient counseling services.
Sec. 5. 24-A MRSA §2835, sub-§2, as repealed and replaced by PL 2005, c. 683,
Pt. A, §40, is repealed.
Sec. 6. 24-A MRSA §2835, sub-§2-A, as repealed and replaced by PL 2005, c.
683, Pt. A, §40, is amended to read:
2-A. Subsections 1 and 2 apply Subsection 1 applies with respect to the following
types of professionals:
A. A psychologist licensed to practice in this State;
B. A certified social worker licensed for the independent practice of social work in
this State;
C. A licensed clinical professional counselor licensed for the independent practice of
counseling in this State;
D. A licensed nurse who is certified by the American Nurses' Association as a clinical
specialist in adult psychiatric and mental health nursing or as a clinical specialist in
child and adolescent psychiatric and mental health nursing;
E. A marriage and family therapist licensed as a marriage and family therapist in this
State; and
F. A licensed pastoral counselor licensed as a pastoral counselor in this State.
Sec. 7. 24-A MRSA §2835, sub-§3, as repealed and replaced by PL 2005, c. 683,
Pt. A, §40, is repealed.
Sec. 8. 24-A MRSA §2835, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Coverage of outpatient counseling services; reimbursement and participation.
An insurer that issues group health care contracts providing coverage for mental health
services shall provide coverage for outpatient counseling services in accordance with this
subsection.
A. An insurer shall reimburse for outpatient counseling services when those services
are provided by a licensed counseling professional providing services that are within
the lawful scope of practice of the counseling professional’s license, including a master
social worker, clinical social worker, clinical professional counselor, pastoral
counselor or marriage and family therapist.
B. At a minimum, an insurer shall reimburse for outpatient counseling services in an
amount equal to 150% of the MaineCare reimbursement rate for that service.
C. An insurer may not discriminate against a licensed counseling professional as
described in paragraph A or arbitrarily reduce the reimbursement rate for outpatient
counseling services provided by a licensed counseling professional based solely on the
type of license held by a licensed counseling professional.
D. An insurer may not impose prior authorization or referral requirements as a
condition of coverage for outpatient counseling services or impose any restriction or
limitation on access to outpatient counseling services that does not have a clinical basis.
Page 2 - 132LR1782(01)

E. An insurer shall maintain an adequate network of licensed counseling professionals
to ensure reasonable access to outpatient counseling services.
Sec. 9. 24-A MRSA §4234-A, sub-§8-A, as amended by PL 2003, c. 20, Pt. VV,
§23 and affected by §25, is repealed.
Sec. 10. 24-A MRSA §4234-A, sub-§8-B is enacted to read:
8-B. Coverage of outpatient counseling services; reimbursement and
participation. A health maintenance organization that issues individual or group health
care contracts providing coverage for mental health services shall provide coverage for
outpatient counseling services in accordance with this subsection.
A. A health maintenance organization shall reimburse for outpatient counseling
services when those services are provided by a licensed counseling professional
providing services that are within the lawful scope of practice of the counseling
professional’s license, including a master social worker, clinical social worker, clinical
professional counselor, pastoral counselor or marriage and family therapist.
B. At a minimum, a health maintenance organization shall reimburse for outpatient
counseling services in an amount equal to 150% of the MaineCare reimbursement rate
for that service.
C. A health maintenance organization may not discriminate against a licensed
counseling professional as described in paragraph A or arbitrarily reduce the
reimbursement rate for outpatient counseling services provided by a licensed
counseling professional based solely on the type of license held by a licensed
counseling professional.
D. A health maintenance organization may not impose prior authorization or referral
requirements as a condition of coverage for outpatient counseling services or impose
any restriction or limitation on access to outpatient counseling services that does not
have a clinical basis.
E. A health maintenance organization shall maintain an adequate network of licensed
counseling professionals to ensure reasonable access to outpatient counseling services.
Sec. 11. Application. This Act applies to all policies, contracts and certificates
executed, delivered, issued for delivery, continued or renewed in this State on or after
January 1, 2026. For purposes of this Act, all contracts are deemed to be renewed no later
than the next yearly anniversary of the contract date.